Utah statutes.
63K-2-102.   Legislative findings and purpose.

(1)  The Legislature finds that the lack of energy resources and other energy resource emergencies may threaten the availability of essential services and transportation and the operation of the economy, jeopardizing the peace, health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state.

(2)  The Legislature further finds that it is necessary to provide an orderly procedure for anticipating and responding to energy resource shortages and disruptions and to grant, under conditions prescribed in this act, emergency powers to the governor to order involuntary curtailments in the use of energy resources.

(3)  The Legislature further finds and declares that it is the policy of this state to assist the United States in effective management and control of such factors and situations as contribute to an emergency affecting or likely to affect this state; to cooperate with other states in matters related to an emergency affecting or likely to affect this state; to meet extraordinary conditions in this state arising out of the crisis by taking such steps as are necessary and appropriate; and generally to protect the peace, health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state.

